Illinois, session 104th, HB713.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Broadband Adoption Fund Act is 5amended by changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (305 ILCS 23/1)7    Sec. 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the the 8Illinois Broadband Adoption Fund Act.9(Source: P.A. 102-648, eff. 8-27-21.)